trunk/apertium-eu-es/apertium-eu-es.eu-es-adjgender.dix
    <pardef n="NC_IZE_IZB">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC00000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC0000D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC0000A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC0000X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>noKAT</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Kristo</l> 
        <r>cristo</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_IZB"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Antzinako_Erregimena</l> 
        <r>antiguo_régimen</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_IZB"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Arkitekto_teknikoa</l> 
        <r>arquitecto_técnico</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_IZB"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Ahaldun_Nagusia</l> 
        <r>diputado_general</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_IZB"/> 
    </e>
